fr: Outils inclus avec le tire-bouchon: Ouvre-bouteille/décapsuleur; Ouvre-boîte; Lame de coupe-feuille; Lame de couteau; Coupe-capsule dentelé; Couteau de sommelier; Autre
pt-PT: Ferramentas para saca-rolhas incluídas: Abre-garrafas/Saca-rolhas; Abre-latas; Lâmina de corte de película; Lâmina de faca; Cortador de película serrilhado; Faca de sommelier; Outro
tr: Tirbuşonla birlikte sunulan aletler: Şişe açacağı/kapak açıcı; Konserve açacağı; Folyo kesici bıçak; Bıçak ağzı; Tırtıklı folyo kesici; Sommelier bıçağı; Diğer
nb: Inkluderte korketrekkerverktøy: Flaskeåpner/korkløfter; Boksåpner; Foliekutterblad; Knivblad; Taggete foliekutter; Sommelier-kniv; Annet
da: Proptrækkerværktøj medfølger: Flaskeåbner/kapselåbner; Dåseåbner; Folieskæreblad; Knivblad; Takket folieskærer; Sommelierkniv; Andet
pl: Narzędzia korkociągowe w zestawie: Otwieracz do butelek; Otwieracz do puszek; Ostrze do cięcia folii; Ostrze noża; Ząbkowany nożyk do folii; Nóż sommeliera; Pozostałe
zh-CN: 包含的开瓶器工具: 开瓶器/瓶盖起子; 开罐器; 锡箔切割刀片; 刀片; 锯齿切箔器; 侍酒师刀; 其他
sv: Korkskruvsverktyg som ingår: Flasköppnare/kapsyllyftare; Konservöppnare; Folieskärare; Knivblad; Tandad folieskärare; Sommelierkniv; Övrigt
en: Corkscrew tools included: Bottle opener/cap lifter; Can opener; Foil cutter blade; Knife blade; Serrated foil cutter; Sommelier's knife; Other
lt-LT: Kamščiatraukio komplekte esantys įrankiai: Butelių atidarytuvas / kamštelių pakėlėjas; Skardinių atidarytuvas; Folijos pjoviklio ašmenys; Peilio ašmenys; Dantytas folijos pjaustytuvas; Someljė peilis; Kita
th: อุปกรณ์ที่มาพร้อมกับที่เปิดขวดไวน์: ที่เปิดขวด/ที่งัดฝาขวด; ที่เปิดกระป๋อง; ใบมีดตัดฟอยล์; ใบมีด; ที่ตัดฟอยล์แบบฟันเลื่อย; มีดซอมเมอลิเยร์; อื่นๆ
ko: 코르크스크루 포함 도구: 병따개/뚜껑 따개; 통조림 따개; 호일 커터 칼날; 나이프 블레이드; 톱니 모양 호일 커터; 소믈리에 나이프; 기타
ro-RO: Instrumente pentru tirbușon incluse: Deschizător de sticle/capace; Deschizător de conserve; Lamă pentru tăiat folie; Lamă de cuțit; Tăietor zimțat pentru folie; Cuțit de somelier; Altele
vi: Các dụng cụ đi kèm của đồ khui nút chai: Dụng cụ mở chai/nắp chai; Đồ khui hộp; Lưỡi cắt giấy bạc; Lưỡi dao; Dao cắt giấy bạc răng cưa; Dao của người phục vụ rượu; Khác
ru: Инструменты в комплекте со штопором: Открывалка для бутылок/подъемник крышки; Консервный нож; Лезвие резака для фольги; Лезвие ножа; Зубчатый резак для фольги; Нож сомелье; Другое
cs: Zahrnuté nástroje vývrtky: Otvírák na korunkové uzávěry; Otvírák na konzervy; Nůž na fólii; Čepel; Vroubkovaná řezačka na fólii; Číšnický nůž; Jiné
sl-SI: Priložena orodja odpirala: Odpirač za steklenice/dvigalo za pokrovčke; Odpirač za pločevinke; Rezilo za rezalnik folije; Rezilo noža; Nazobčan rezalnik folije; Sommelierjev nož; Druga
es: Herramientas de sacacorchos incluidas: Abridor de botellas/levantador de tapas; Abrelatas; Cuchilla cortadora de láminas; Hoja de cuchillo; Cortador de láminas dentado; Sacacorchos profesional; Otros
de: Enthaltene Korkenzieherwerkzeuge: Flaschenöffner/Verschlussheber; Dosenöffner; Folienschneiderklinge; Messerklinge; Gezackter Folienschneider; Sommeliermesser; Sonstiges
fi: Korkkiruuvityökalut sisältyvät hintaan: Pullonavaaja; Tölkinavaaja; Folioleikkurin terä; Veitsen terä; Sahalaitainen folioleikkuri; Sommelierin veitsi; Muu
it: Strumenti inclusi con il cavatappi: Apribottiglie/sollevatore di tappi; Apriscatole; Lama per tagliacapsule; Lama del coltello; Tagliacapsule seghettato; Coltello da sommelier; Altro
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia sú aj nástroje vývrtky: Otvárač na fľaše/korunkové uzávery; Otvárač na konzervy; Čepeľ na rezanie fólie; Čepeľ noža; Zúbkovaný rezač fólie; Someliérsky nôž; Iné
zh-TW: 包含開瓶器工具: 開瓶器/開瓶起子; 開罐器; 鋁箔切割機刀片; 刀刃; 鋸齒鋁箔切割機; 侍酒刀; 其他
bg-BG: Включени инструменти за тирбушон: Отварачка за бутилки/отварачка за капачки; Инструмент за отваряне на консерви; Нож за рязане на фолио; Острие на нож; Назъбен нож за фолио; Сомелиерски нож; Друго
hr-HR: Uključeni alati za vadičep: Otvarač za boce/poklopce; Otvarač za limenke; Oštrica za rezanje folije; Oštrica noža; Nazubljeni rezač folije; Sommelierski nož; Ostalo
nl: Inbegrepen kurkentrekkeraccessoires: Flesopener/dopopener; Blikopener; Foliesnijmes; Mesblad; Gekartelde foliesnijder; Sommeliersmes; Overig
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα εργαλεία τιρμπουσόν: Ανοιχτήρι μπουκαλιών/ανυψωτήρας καπακιού; Ανοιχτήρι κονσερβών; Λεπίδα κοπής αλουμινίου; Λεπίδα μαχαιριού; Οδοντωτός κόφτης αλουμινίου; Μαχαίρι σομελιέ; Άλλο
ja: コルク栓抜きツール付属: ボトルオープナー/キャップリフター; 缶切り; ホイルカッター刃; ナイフの刃; 鋸歯ホイルカッター; ソムリエナイフ; その他
hu: Dugóhúzó szerszámok mellékelve: Üvegnyitó/kupakemelő; Konzervnyitó; Fóliavágó penge; Késpenge; Fogazott fóliavágó; Sommelier kés; Egyéb
pt-BR: Ferramentas para saca-rolhas incluídas: Abridor de garrafas/levantador de tampas; Abridor de lata; Lâmina de corte de folha; Lâmina de faca; Cortador de folha serrilhado; Saca-rolhas de sommelier; Outro